Tennessee, session 114, SB1675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-508(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the following sentence:
Such notification shall be sent by United States mail, addressed to the last known
address of the taxpayer, and shall be effective when mailed.
and substituting instead:
Such notification must be sent by United States mail, addressed to the last
known address of the taxpayer, and is effective when mailed. If the notification is
sent by email pursuant to subsection (c) in lieu of United States mail, then the
notification is effective when electronically sent.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1675
011104
- 1 -